Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Unlawful Access to a Computer

434.840.
Definitions.

For the purposes of KRS

434.840

to

434.860

, the following words, including any form of the word, and terms shall have the following meanings:

“Access” means to approach, instruct, communicate with, manipulate, store data in, retrieve or intercept data from, or otherwise make use of any resources of, a computer, computer system, or computer network;

“Computer” means any device, equipment, or facility that uses a computer program or other instructions, stored either temporarily or permanently, to perform specific operations including but not limited to logical, arithmetic, or memory functions with or on data or a computer program that can store, retrieve, alter, or communicate the results of the operations to a person, computer program, computer, computer system, or computer network;

“Computer network” means an interconnection of two (2) or more devices used for the purpose of transmitting any combination of voice, video, or data including but not limited to bridges, routers, switches, antennas, or towers connected by hardwire or wireless communications lines;

“Computer program” means a set of instructions or statements and related data that, when executed in actual or modified form, cause a computer, computer system, or computer network to perform specified functions;

“Computer software” means computer programs, procedures, or associated documentation concerned with the operation of a computer, computer system, or computer network for system control or processing of data;

“Computer system” means a set of related computer equipment, devices, data, software, or hardware that is designed to perform a specific function;

“Data” means a representation of information, knowledge, facts, concepts, or instructions which are being prepared or have been prepared in a formalized manner, and is intended to be stored or processed, or is being stored or processed, or has been stored or processed, in a computer, computer system, or computer network;

“Device” includes but is not limited to an electronic, magnetic, electrochemical, biochemical, hydraulic, optical, or organic object that performs input, output, or storage functions by the manipulation of electronic, magnetic, or other impulses;

“Effective consent” means consent by a person legally authorized to act for the owner. Consent is not effective if it is:

Induced by deception or coercion;

Given by a person who the actor knows is not legally authorized to act for the owner;

Given by a person who by reason of age, mental disease or defect, or intoxication is known by the actor to be unable to make responsible property or data dispositions; or

Used for a purpose other than that for which the consent is given;

“Financial instruments” includes but is not limited to any check, draft, warrant, money order, certificate of deposit, negotiable instrument, letter of credit, bill of exchange, credit or debit card, transaction authorization mechanism, marketable security, or any electronic representation thereof;

“Intellectual property” includes data, text, images, sound, codes, computer programs, software, or databases which may be in any form, including but not limited to, computer printouts, magnetic storage media, punched cards, or which may be stored internally in the memory of a computer;

“Loss or damage” means the result of accessing, attempting to access, or causing to be accessed, without effective consent, any computer software, computer program, data, computer, computer system, computer network, or any part thereof, including but not limited to theft, alteration, or destruction of data, security breaches, or disruption of services;

“Owner” means a person who has title, license, or other lawful possession of the property, a person who has the right to restrict access to the property, or a person who has a greater right to possession of the property than the actor;

“Property” includes but is not limited to intellectual property, financial instruments, data, computer programs, documentation associated with data, computers, computer systems and computer programs, all in machine-readable or human-readable form, and any tangible or intangible item of value; and

“Services” includes but is not limited to the use of a computer, a computer system, a computer network, computer software, computer program, or data to perform tasks.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 210, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

434.845.
Unlawful access to a computer in the first degree.

A person is guilty of unlawful access to a computer in the first degree when he or she, without the effective consent of the owner, knowingly and willfully, directly or indirectly accesses, causes to be accessed, or attempts to access any computer software, computer program, data, computer, computer system, computer network, or any part thereof, for the purpose of:

Devising or executing any scheme or artifice to defraud; or

Obtaining money, property, or services for themselves or another by means of false or fraudulent pretenses, representations, or promises.

Unlawful access to a computer in the first degree is a Class C felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 210, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 350, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

434.850.
Unlawful access to a computer in the second degree.

A person is guilty of unlawful access to a computer in the second degree when he or she, without the effective consent of the owner, knowingly and willfully, directly or indirectly accesses, causes to be accessed, or attempts to access any computer software, computer program, data, computer, computer system, computer network, or any part thereof, which results in the loss or damage of three hundred dollars ($300) or more.

Unlawful access to a computer in the second degree is a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 210, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 350, § 3, effective July 15, 2002.

434.851.
Unlawful access in the third degree.

A person is guilty of unlawful access in the third degree when he or she, without the effective consent of the owner, knowingly and willfully, directly or indirectly accesses, causes to be accessed, or attempts to access any computer software, computer program, data, computer, computer system, computer network, or any part thereof, which results in the loss or damage of less than three hundred dollars ($300).

Unlawful access to a computer in the third degree is a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 350, § 4, effective July 15, 2002.

434.853.
Unlawful access in the fourth degree.

A person is guilty of unlawful access in the fourth degree when he or she, without the effective consent of the owner, knowingly and willfully, directly or indirectly accesses, causes to be accessed, or attempts to access any computer software, computer program, data, computer, computer system, computer network, or any part thereof, which does not result in loss or damage.

Unlawful access to a computer in the fourth degree is a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 350, § 5, effective July 15, 2002.

434.855.
Misuse of computer information.

A person is guilty of misuse of computer information when he or she:

Receives, conceals, or uses, or aids another in doing so, any proceeds of a violation of KRS

434.845

; or

Receives, conceals, or uses or aids another in doing so, any books, records, documents, property, financial instrument, computer software, computer program, or other material, property, or objects, knowing the same to have been used in or obtained from a violation of KRS

434.845

.

Misuse of computer information is a Class C felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 210, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 350, § 6, effective July 15, 2002.

434.860.
Venue.

For the purpose of venue under the provisions of KRS

434.845

,

434.850

,

434.851

,

434.853

, or

434.855

, any violation of KRS

434.845

,

434.850

,

434.851

,

434.853

, or

434.855

shall be considered to have been committed: in any county in which any act was performed in furtherance of any transaction violating KRS 434.845, 434.850, 434.851, 434.853, or 434.855; in any county in which any violator had control or possession of any proceeds of said violation or of any books, records, documents, property, financial instrument, computer software, computer program or other material, objects, or items which were used in furtherance of said violation; and in any county from which, to which or through which any access to a computer, computer system, or computer network was made whether by wires, electromagnetic waves, microwaves, or any other means of communication.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 210, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 350, § 7, effective July 15, 2002.